vi: Hồ sơ cung que: Dynabow; Độ cong cực thấp; Jumbow; Độ cong muộn; Độ cong thấp; Độ cong vừa; Độ cong trung bình thấp; Độ cong chuyên nghiệp; Độ cong tiêu chuẩn; Độ cong siêu thấp; Khác
th: รูปทรงคันธนู: ไดนาโบว์; โลว์โบว์เอ็กซ์ตรีม; จัมโบว์; เลทโบว์; โลว์โบว์; มิดโบว์; มิด-โลว์โบว์; โปรโบว์; โบว์มาตรฐาน; อัลตราโลว์โบว์; อื่นๆ
cs: Profil ohybu hole: Dynabow; Extrémní low bow; Jumbow; Late bow; Low bow; Mid bow; Mid-low bow; Pro bow; Standard bow; Ultra low bow; Jiné
sl-SI: Profil loka palice: Dynabow; Ekstremno nizek lok; Jumbow; Pozen lok; Nizek lok; Srednji lok; Srednje nizek lok; Pro lok; Standardni lok; Ultra nizek lok; Drugo
fi: Mailan kaarevuus: Dynabow; Extreme low bow; Jumbow; Late bow; Low bow; Mid bow; Mid-low bow; Pro bow; Standard bow; Ultra low bow; Muu
nb: Profil for pinnebue: Dynabow; Extreme low bow; Jumbow; Late bow; Low bow; Mid bow; Mid-low bow; Pro bow; Standard bow; Ultra low bow; Annet
en: Stick bow profile: Dynabow; Extreme low bow; Jumbow; Late bow; Low bow; Mid bow; Mid-low bow; Pro bow; Standard bow; Ultra low bow; Other
zh-CN: 曲棍球杆弯曲轮廓: Dynabow; 极低弧度; Jumbow; 后弯弧度; 低弧度; 中弧度; 中低弧度; 专业弧度; 标准弧度; 超低弧度; 其他
hr-HR: Profil štapnog luka: Dynabow; Iznimno niski luk; Jumbow; Kasni luk; Niski luk; Srednji luk; Srednje niski luk; Pro bow; Standardni luk; Ultra niski luk; Ostalo
pt-BR: Taco perfil de curvatura: Dynabow; Curva baixa extrema; Jumbow; Curva tardia; Curva baixa; Curva média; Curva média-baixa; Pro bow; Curva padrão; Curva ultrabaixa; Outro
ja: スティックボウプロファイル: ダイナボウ; エクストリームローボウ; ジャンボウ; レイトボウ; ローボウ; ミッドボウ; ミッドローボウ; プロボウ; スタンダードボウ; ウルトラローボウ; その他
el: Προφίλ καμπυλότητας μπαστουνιού: Dynabow; Πολύ χαμηλή καμπύλη; Jumbow; Καμπύλη late; Χαμηλή καμπύλη; Μεσαία καμπύλη; Μεσαία προς χαμηλή καμπύλη; Pro bow; Κανονική καμπύλη; Εξαιρετικά χαμηλή καμπύλη; Άλλο
bg-BG: Профил на стика: Dynabow; Изключително ниска извивка; Jumbow; Късна извивка; Ниска извивка; Средна извивка; Средно-ниска извивка; Pro bow; Стандартна извивка; Ултра ниска извивка; Друго
es: Perfil de arco del palo: Dynabow; Curva baja extrema; Jumbow; Curva tardía; Curva baja; Curva media; Curva media baja; Curva pro; Curva estándar; Curva ultra baja; Otro
zh-TW: 球桿弧度輪廓: Dynabow; 極低彎度; Jumbow; 後彎; 低彎度; 中彎度; 中低彎度; 專業彎度; 標準彎度; 超低彎度; 其他
ko: 스틱 보우 프로필: 다이나보우; 익스트림 로우 보우; 점보우; 레이트 보우; 로우 보우; 미드 보우; 미드 로우 보우; 프로 보우; 스탠다드 보우; 울트라 로우 보우; 기타
sk-SK: Profil zahnutia drieku: Dynabow; Extrémne nízky oblúk; Jumbow; Neskorý oblúk; Nízky oblúk; Stredný oblúk; Stredne nízky oblúk; Profi oblúk; Štandardný oblúk; Ultra nízky oblúk; Iné
fr: Profil de courbure du bâton: Dynabow; Courbure extrêmement basse; Jumbow; Courbure tardive; Courbure basse; Courbure moyenne; Courbure moyenne-basse; Courbure pro; Courbure standard; Courbure ultra-basse; Autre
pl: Profil łuku kijowego: Dynabow; Extreme low bow; Jumbow; Late bow; Low bow; Mid bow; Mid-low bow; Pro bow; Standard bow; Ultra low bow; Inny
it: Profilo dell'arco della mazza: Dynabow; Extreme low bow; Jumbow; Late bow; Low bow; Mid bow; Mid-low bow; Pro bow; Standard bow; Ultra low bow; Altro
da: Bueprofil for fieldhockeystav: Dynabow; Extreme low bow; Jumbow; Late bow; Low bow; Mid bow; Mid-low bow; Pro bow; Standard bow; Ultra low bow; Andet
pt-PT: Perfil de curvatura do taco: Dynabow; Arco extremamente baixo; Jumbow; Arco tardio; Arco baixo; Arco médio; Arco médio-baixo; Arco pro; Arco padrão; Arco ultrabaixo; Outro
hu: Ütőprofil: Dynabow; Extrém alacsony hajlítás; Jumbow; Késői hajlítás; Alacsony hajlítás; Közepes hajlítás; Közepesen alacsony hajlítás; Pro bow; Normál hajlítás; Ultra alacsony hajlítás; Egyéb
lt-LT: Ledo ritulio lazdos išlinkio profilis: „Dynabow“; Ypač žemas linkis; „Jumbow“; Vėlyvas linkis; Žemas linkis; Vidutinis linkis; Vidutiniškai žemas linkis; Profesionalų linkis; Standartinis linkis; Itin žemas linkis; Kita
de: Bogenprofil des Schlägers: Dynabow; Extreme Low Bow; Jumbow; Late Bow; Low Bow; Mid Bow; Mid-Low Bow; Pro Bow; Standard Bow; Ultra Low Bow; Andere
sv: Profil för stickbåge: Dynabow; Extreme low bow; Jumbow; Late bow; Low bow; Mid bow; Mid-low bow; Pro bow; Standard bow; Ultra low bow; Övrigt
tr: Sopa yay profili: Dynabow; Aşırı düşük kavis; Jumbow; Geç kavis; Düşük kavis; Orta kavis; Orta düşük kavis; Pro bow; Standart kavis; Ultra düşük kavis; Diğer
ro-RO: Profil de curbură a crosei: Dynabow; Curbură extrem de redusă; Jumbow; Curbură târzie; Curbură redusă; Curbură medie; Curbură mediu-redusă; Pro bow; Curbură standard; Curbură ultra-redusă; Altele
nl: Hockeystick bowprofiel: Dynabow; Extreme low bow; Jumbow; Late bow; Low bow; Mid bow; Mid-low bow; Pro bow; Standard bow; Ultra low bow; Overig
ru: Профиль изгиба клюшки: Dynabow; Экстремально низкий прогиб; Jumbow; Поздний прогиб; Низкий прогиб; Средний прогиб; Средне-низкий прогиб; Pro bow; Стандартный прогиб; Ультранизкий прогиб; Другое